Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 12

Reorganization and Liquidation

45-3-1201. Commissioner's authority to take possession.

Requirements for Possession.

The commissioner in the commissioner's discretion may take possession of the books, records, and assets of every kind and character of any association subject to this chapter for any of the purposes enumerated in subsection (b) if it appears from reports or other information received by the commissioner or from any examination conducted pursuant to this chapter that:

The association is in an impaired condition;

The business of the association is being conducted in a fraudulent, unlawful, or unsafe manner;

The association is unable to continue normal operation;

Any examination conducted pursuant to this chapter is being or has been obstructed or impeded; or

The insurance of deposit accounts of the association has been or will be cancelled.

Unless the commissioner finds that an emergency exists that may result in loss to depositors or other creditors and that requires that the commissioner take immediate possession, the commissioner first shall send written notice by certified mail to the home office of the association, specifying the conditions criticized and stating a reasonable time within which correction shall be made. The notice shall also provide that the association shall have the opportunity to request a hearing in accordance with this chapter.

Purposes of Taking Possession. The purposes of taking possession of an association may be examination, further examination, conserving of its assets, restoration of impaired condition, reorganization, or liquidation.

Procedures for Possession; Power of Commissioner.

The commissioner shall take possession by posting upon the premises of the association a notice reciting that the commissioner is assuming possession pursuant to this section and the time, not earlier than the posting of the notice, when the commissioner's possession shall be deemed to commence. A copy of the notice shall be filed in a court of general jurisdiction in the county in which the home office is located. The commissioner shall notify the insurer insuring the deposit accounts of the association immediately upon commencing any action to assume possession.

When the commissioner has taken possession of an association, the commissioner shall be vested with the full and exclusive powers of management and control, including the power to continue or to discontinue the business, to stop or to limit the payment of its obligations, to employ any necessary assistants, to execute any instrument in the name of the association to commence, defend, and conduct in its name any action or proceeding in which it may be a party, to terminate the commissioner's possession by restoring the association to its board of directors and to reorganize or liquidate the association in accordance with this chapter. The commissioner may borrow money on behalf of and in the name of the association and may pledge, transfer, or otherwise utilize its assets to secure the loan. As soon as practicable after taking possession, the commissioner shall make an inventory of the assets and file a copy thereof with the court in which the notice of possession was filed.

When the commissioner has taken possession, there shall be a postponement until six (6) months after the commencement of possession of the date upon which any period of limitation fixed by a statute or agreement would otherwise expire on a claim or right of action of the association or upon which an appeal must be taken or a pleading or other document must be filed by the association in any pending action or proceeding.

Powers of Commissioner in Emergencies.

If, in the opinion of the commissioner, an emergency exists that will result in loss to depositors or other creditors, the commissioner may take immediate possession of an association without a prior hearing. Any person aggrieved by this action of the commissioner may seek review of the action by proceedings in accordance with title 27, chapter 9.

If the commissioner determines to liquidate the association, the commissioner shall send written notice of the determination to the association and to the directors, officers, stockholders, or members, depositors, and other known creditors thereof, together with a notice of the opportunity for any of them to request a hearing in accordance with chapter.

If the commissioner shall determine to reorganize the association, the commissioner shall be required to afford a hearing to all interested parties, which hearing shall be conducted pursuant to the applicable provisions of this chapter. After the hearing, the commissioner shall enter an order proposing a reorganization plan. A copy of the plan shall be sent to each depositor and other creditor who will not receive payment of claim in full under the plan, together with notice that, unless within sixty (60) days the plan is disapproved in writing by persons holding one-third (1/3) or more of the aggregate amount of the claims, the commissioner will proceed to effect the reorganization in accordance with the plan. A department, agency, or political subdivision of this state holding a claim that will not be paid in full is authorized to participate as any other creditor.

Judgments; Liens; Preferences. No judgment, lien, garnishment, or attachment shall be executed upon any asset of the association while it is in the possession of the commissioner. Upon the election of the commissioner in connection with the liquidation or reorganization:

Any lien, garnishment, or attachment, other than an attorney's or mechanic's lien, obtained upon any asset of the association during the commissioner's possession or within four (4) months prior to commencement thereof shall be vacated, except liens created by the commissioner while in possession; and

Any transfer of an asset of the association made after or in contemplation of its impaired condition with intent to effect a preference shall be voided.

Expenses of Possession. All necessary and reasonable expenses of the commissioner's possession of an association and of its reorganization or liquidation shall be defrayed from the assets of the association.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.01; T.C.A., § 45-1701.

Compiler's Notes. The former chapter, §§ 45-1701—45-1713 (Acts 1933, ch. 19, §§ 12-14; 1935 (1st E.S.), ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; 1943, ch. 134, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 3898.34-3898.45 (Williams, §§ 3898.12- 3898.14); Acts 1976, ch. 582, §§ 3(d),(4), concerning insolvency and liquidation of building and loan associations, was repealed by Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 6.01.

For transfer of functions under this chapter from the department of commerce and insurance to the department of financial institutions, see Executive Order No. 38 (February 11, 1983).

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 17.

45-3-1202. Requirements of reorganization plan.

Plan of Reorganization. A plan of reorganization shall not be approved by the commissioner unless:

The plan is feasible and fair to all classes of depositors, other creditors and stockholders, or members;

The plan assures the removal of any director, officer, or employee responsible for any unsound or unlawful action or the existence of an impaired condition; and

Any merger or consolidation provided by the plan conforms to the requirements of this chapter.

Modification of Plan. Whenever, in the course of reorganization, supervening conditions render the plan unfair or its execution impractical, the commissioner may modify the plan or liquidate the association. The action shall be taken by order upon appropriate notice of opportunity to request a hearing as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.02; T.C.A., § 45-1702.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-1201.

45-3-1203. Liquidation by commissioner.

Powers of Commissioner. In liquidating an association, the commissioner may exercise any power of the association, but shall not, without the approval of the court in which notice of possession has been filed:

Sell any asset of the association having a value in excess of five hundred dollars ($500);

Compromise or release any claim if the amount of the claim exceeds five hundred dollars ($500), exclusive of interest; or

Make any payment on any claim, other than a claim upon an obligation incurred by the commissioner, before preparing and filing a schedule of the commissioner's determination.

Termination of Contracts. Within six (6) months after the commencement of liquidation, and thereafter during the course of liquidation, the commissioner may by the commissioner's election terminate any executory contract under which the association has contracted either to receive or to provide services, or any obligation of the association as a lessee. A lessor shall receive sixty (60) days' notice of the commissioner's election to terminate the lease, and the lessor shall have no claim for rent or other damages due to the termination other than rent accrued to the date of termination.

Notice of Liquidation. As soon after the commencement of liquidation as practicable, the commissioner shall send notice of the liquidation to each known depositor, other creditor, and lessee of a safe deposit box or bailor of property held by the association at the address shown on the books of the association. The notice shall also be published in a newspaper of general circulation in each county in which the home office or any branch office is located once a week for three (3) successive weeks. The commissioner shall send with the notice a statement of the amount shown on the books of the association to be the claim of the depositor or other creditor. The notice shall demand that property held by the association as bailee or in a safe deposit box be withdrawn by the person entitled thereto and that claims of depositors and other creditors, if the amount claimed differs from that stated in the notice to be due, or if any claim has not otherwise been recognized in whole or in part by the association, be filed with the commissioner before a specified date not earlier than sixty (60) days thereafter in accordance with the procedures prescribed in the notice.

Safe Deposit Boxes. Safe deposit boxes, the contents of which have not been removed before the date specified, shall be opened by the commissioner and the sealed packages containing the contents and the certificates, together with any unclaimed property held by the association as bailee and certified inventories thereof shall be reported to the state treasurer who shall deal with them in accordance with the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act, compiled in title 66, chapter 29, part 1.

Claims of Depositors, etc. Within six (6) months after the last day specified in the notice for the filing of claims or a longer period that may be allowed by the court in which notice of possession has been filed, the commissioner shall:

Reject any claim if the commissioner doubts the validity of the claim;

Determine the amount, if any, owing to each depositor or other known creditor and the priority of the depositor's or creditor's claim;

Prepare a schedule of the commissioner's determinations for filing in the court in which notice of possession was filed; and

Send written notice by certified mail to each person whose claim has not been allowed in full of the time when and the place where the schedule of determinations will be available for inspection and the date, not sooner than thirty (30) days thereafter, when the commissioner will file the commissioner's schedule in the court in which notice of possession was filed.

Objections to Commissioner's Determinations. Within twenty (20) days after the filing of the commissioner's schedule, any depositor, other creditor, or stockholder or member may file an objection to any determination made. Any objections so filed shall be heard and determined by the court, upon such notice to the commissioner and interested claimants as the court may prescribe. If the objection is sustained, the court shall direct an appropriate modification of the schedule. After filing the schedule, the commissioner may, from time to time, make partial distribution to the holders of claims that are undisputed or have been allowed by the court, if a proper reserve is established for the payment of disputed claims. As soon as is practicable after the determination of all objections, the commissioner shall make final distribution.

Priorities.

The following claims shall have priority:

Administrative expenses;

Obligations incurred by the commissioner while in possession of an association;

Wages and salaries of officers and employees earned during the three-month period preceding the commissioner's possession in an amount not exceeding six hundred dollars ($600) for any one (1) person;

Fees and assessments due to the department; and

Deposit accounts to the extent of two hundred dollars ($200) for each depositor.

After the payment of all other claims with interest at the maximum rate permitted on the deposits, the commissioner shall pay claims otherwise proper that were not filed within the time prescribed. If the sum available for any class is insufficient to provide payment in full, the sum shall be distributed to the claimants in the class pro rata.

Distribution of Excess. Any assets remaining after all claims have been paid shall be distributed to the stockholders or members in accordance with their respective interests.

Unclaimed Funds. Unclaimed funds remaining after completion of the liquidation shall be treated as property held in the course of dissolution and reported to the state treasurer in accordance with title 66, chapter 29, part 1.

Final Account. When the assets have been distributed in accordance with this section, the commissioner shall file an account with the court. Upon approval thereof, the commissioner shall be relieved of liability in connection with the liquidation and the certificate of authority and the charter shall be cancelled.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.03; T.C.A., § 45-1703; Acts 1983, ch. 78, §§ 13, 14; 2017, ch. 457, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-1201.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, §§ 16, 18.

45-3-1204. Appointment of receiver.

The commissioner, after taking possession of an association for any of the purposes set forth, may, upon application to and approval by the court in which the notice of possession was filed, place the possession of the association in a receiver.

Without limitation to the scope of the powers and responsibilities of a receiver under any law of this state, the receiver shall have all the rights, powers, duties, and obligations granted to the commissioner in possession.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.04; T.C.A., § 45-1704.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-1201.